Wisconsin, session 2025, AB5.
do enact as follows:AB5,1Section 1. 118.03 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:118.03 (1) The school board shall adopt all the textbooks necessary for use in the schools under its charge. The school board shall file the list of the adopted books shall be filed textbooks with the school district clerk and shall post the list on the school board’s website.AB5,2Section 2. 118.03 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:118.03 (1m) (a) Upon written request, a resident of a school district may inspect a copy of any textbook adopted under sub. (1) at a location designated by the school board for the public to access records under s. 19.34 and at no cost to the resident. The school board shall comply with a written request under this paragraph by no later than 14 days after the date on which the school board receives the written request.(b) A school board shall adopt procedures under which the school board is able to make available for inspection a copy of any textbook adopted under sub. (1) in fewer than 14 days.(c) 1. This subsection may not be construed to require a school board to take any action that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the federal Copyright Act, 17 USC 101 to 1511.2. Nothing in this subsection limits a school district resident’s rights to access or copy records, as defined in s. 19.32 (2), under subch. II of ch. 19.AB5,3Section 3. 118.03 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:118.03 (4) Any person violating this section sub. (1), (2), or (3) may be fined not less than $25 nor more than $100.AB5,4Section 4. 118.032 of the statutes is created to read:118.032 Curricula and instructional materials; inspection. (1) In this section:(a) “Curriculum” means a curriculum plan adopted by a school board to comply with a school board duty under s. 118.01 (2), 118.015, 118.017, 118.019, or 121.02 (1) (c), (h), (k), (L), or (m).(b) “Instructional material” means any course content or resource included in a curriculum.(2) (a) Upon written request, a resident of a school district may inspect a copy of any curriculum or instructional material used in a school in the school district at a location designated by the school board for the public to access records under s. 19.34 and at no cost to the resident. The school board shall comply with a written request under this paragraph by no later than 14 days after the date on which the school board receives the written request.(b) A school board shall establish procedures under which the school board is able to make available for inspection a copy of any curriculum or instructional material used in a school under its charge in fewer than 14 days.(c) 1. This subsection may not be construed to require a school board to take any action that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the federal Copyright Act, 17 USC 101 to 1511.2. Nothing in this subsection limits a school district resident’s rights to access or copy records, as defined in s. 19.32 (2), under subch. II of ch. 19.AB5,5Section 5. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to textbooks adopted for use and curricula and instructional materials used in the school year beginning after the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab5 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab5 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB5 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB5 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB5: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting